Utah statutes.
58-64-305.   Status of licenses held on the effective date of this chapter.

An individual holding a valid Utah license as a deception detection examiner or detection examiner intern under Title 53, Chapter 5, Part 3, Deception Detection Examiners Act, on July 1, 1995, is:

(1)   on or after July 1, 1995, considered to hold a current license under this chapter in the comparable classification of deception detection examiner or deception detection intern; and

(2)  subject to this chapter.

